Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 39. a. Adopt a policy requiring that not less than eighty percent of the students who are accepted at the college of medicine in the doctor of medicine program, and who are accepted at the college of dentistry at the state university of Iowa be residents of Iowa or persons who were, prior to applying to such college, enrolled in an eligible postsecondary institution as defined in section 261E.2. b. Adopt a policy that gives priority for admission to residents of Iowa who apply for the college of medicine in the doctor of medicine program or the college of dentistry at the state university of Iowa. c. Adopt a policy requiring an application for admission to the college of medicine in the doctor of medicine program or the college of dentistry at the state university of Iowa, or for a residency at the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics to include an applicant attestation that includes all of the following: House File 516, p. 2 (1) I was born in Iowa or graduated from an Iowa high school. (2) I have family members or in-laws who reside in Iowa, or I graduated from a public or private university, a college, or a community college located in Iowa. (3) I have resided in a rural community that has similar characteristics to similarly sized rural Iowa communities such as demographics or health disparities. (4) None of the above apply to me; however, I am interested in practicing in Iowa after graduation. (5) None of the above apply to me; however, I am interested in attending the college of medicine in the doctor of medicine program or college of dentistry, or pursuing a residency at the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics. d. (1) Require the state university of Iowa and the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics to submit an annual report to the general assembly that contains, for the immediately preceding calendar year, all of the following: (a) The number of applicants who are residents of Iowa who were accepted to the college of medicine in the doctor of medicine program. (b) The number of applicants who are residents of Iowa who were accepted to the college of dentistry. (c) The number of applicants who are residents of Iowa who were accepted for a residency at the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics. (d) The number of applicants who are residents of Iowa who were not accepted to the college of medicine in the doctor of medicine program, and a brief statement related to why each applicant was denied. (e) The number of applicants who are residents of Iowa who were not accepted to the college of dentistry, and a brief statement related to why each applicant was denied. (f) The number of applicants who are residents of Iowa who were not accepted for a residency at the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics, and a brief statement related to why each applicant was denied. (2) Personal information regarding an applicant in an annual report submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall House File 516, p. 3 be kept confidential as required under the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1232g, and in the same manner as personal information in student records maintained, created, collected, or assembled by or for a school corporation or educational institution in accordance with section 22.7, subsection 1. e. For purposes of this subsection, âresident of Iowaâ means any of the following: (1) An individual who graduated from an Iowa high school. (2) An individual who has lived in Iowa for at least four consecutive years immediately preceding the date the individual applies for admission to the college of medicine in the doctor of medicine program or the college of dentistry at the state university of Iowa, or for a residency at the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics. Sec. 2. Section 263.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 263.2 Degrees ââ reports . 1. A person shall not be admitted to courses of instruction in the university if the person has not completed the elementary instruction in such branches as are taught in the public or accredited nonpublic schools throughout the state. 2. Graduates of the university shall receive degrees or diplomas, or other evidences of distinction such as are usually conferred and granted by universities and are authorized by the state board of regents. 3. The university of Iowa, in collaboration with the university hospitals and clinics, shall submit an annual report to the general assembly providing the following information: a. The states in which members of each graduating class from the college of dentistry and the college of medicineâs doctor of medicine program reside during the year immediately following graduation. The information shall be divided by residents of Iowa at the time of application to the college and nonresidents at the time of application to the college. b. The states in which the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics primary care and specialty residents reside in the year following completion of medical residency and whether following residency such residents accepted fellowships. The House File 516, p. 4 information shall be divided by primary care and various areas of specialty, and whether the medical residents were residents of Iowa prior to applying for admission at an undergraduate college or university, received a baccalaureate degree from a postsecondary institution in Iowa, or graduated from a medical school in Iowa, whether or not the medical residents were residents of Iowa at the time of acceptance into the university of Iowa hospitals and clinicsâ residency programs and, if any residents of Iowa accepted fellowships following residency, the states in which the fellowships are offered and the areas of specialty under the fellowships. c. For purposes of this subsection, âresident of Iowaâ means the same as defined in section 262.9, subsection 39. Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 263.6 Residency and fellowship positions ââ priority for certain candidates ââ rural rotations. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics shall give priority in awarding federal residency positions as established under the federal Balanced Budget Act of 1997, Pub. L. No. 105-33, and fellowships to applicants who are residents of Iowa, attended and earned an undergraduate degree from an Iowa college or university, or attended and earned a medical degree from a medical school in Iowa. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics shall also provide the opportunity to participate in a rural rotation to persons to whom a primary care residency or fellowship position, including such positions in psychiatry, is awarded in order to expose the resident or fellow to rural areas of the state. Sec. 4. MEDICAL RESIDENCY POSITIONS ââ APPLICANTS MEETING CERTAIN CRITERIA ââ ANNUAL REPORT. 1. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics shall offer an interview for an available medical residency position to any applicant who has a residency specialty in obstetrics and gynecology, psychiatry, general surgery, emergency medicine, neurology, or primary care, or an available cardiology fellowship position to any applicant who has a fellowship specialty in cardiology, and who also is a resident of Iowa, attended and earned an undergraduate degree from an Iowa college or university, or attended and earned a medical degree from a medical school in Iowa. House File 516, p. 5 2. The university of Iowa hospitals and clinics shall submit a report to the governor and the general assembly by January 15, annually, regarding the interviews as specified in this section during the prior fiscal year. Specifically, the report shall include for each interview the name of the applicantâs medical school, whether an applicant was offered and participated in an interview, whether the applicant was accepted for one of the residency or fellowship positions, and the total number of available residency and fellowship positions filled by an applicant meeting the criteria under this section. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 516, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor